Florida, session 2026, HB163.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
409.967, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
409.967 Managed care plan accountability.—
(2) The agency shall establish such contract requirements
as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care
program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem
necessary, the contract must require:
(c) Access.—
1. The agency shall establish specific standards for the
number, type, and regional distribution of providers in managed
care plan networks to ensure access to care for both adults and
children. Each plan must maintain a regionwide network of
providers in sufficient numbers to meet the access standards for
specific medical services for all recipients enrolled in the
plan. The exclusive use of mail-order pharmacies may not be
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb163-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 163 2026
sufficient to meet network access standards. Consistent with the
standards established by the agency, provider networks may
include providers located outside the region.
2. The agency shall establish specific standards to ensure
enrollees have access to network providers during state holidays
and outside of regular business hours. At least 50 percent of
primary care providers participating in a plan provider network
must offer appointment availability to Medicaid enrollees
outside of regular business hours. For the purposes of this
subparagraph, the term "outside of regular business hours" means
Monday through Friday between 5 p.m. and 8 a.m. local time and
all day Saturday and Sunday.
3. Each plan shall establish and maintain an accurate and
complete electronic database of contracted providers, including
information about licensure or registration, locations and hours
of operation, specialty credentials and other certifications,
specific performance indicators, and such other information as
the agency deems necessary. The database must be available
online to both the agency and the public and have the capability
to compare the availability of providers to network adequacy
standards and to accept and display feedback from each
provider's patients.
4. Each plan shall submit quarterly reports to the agency
identifying the number of enrollees assigned to each primary
care provider.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb163-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 163 2026
5. The agency shall conduct, or contract for, systematic
and continuous testing of the provider network databases
maintained by each plan to confirm accuracy, confirm that
behavioral health providers are accepting enrollees, and confirm
that enrollees have access to behavioral health services.
6.2. Each managed care plan shall must publish any
prescribed drug formulary or preferred drug list on the plan's
website in a manner that is accessible to and searchable by
enrollees and providers. The plan must update the list within 24
hours after making a change. Each plan must ensure that the
prior authorization process for prescribed drugs is readily
accessible to health care providers, including posting
appropriate contact information on its website and providing
timely responses to providers. For Medicaid recipients diagnosed
with hemophilia who have been prescribed anti-hemophilic-factor
replacement products, the agency shall provide for those
products and hemophilia overlay services through the agency's
hemophilia disease management program.
7.3. Managed care plans, and their fiscal agents or
intermediaries, must accept prior authorization requests for any
service electronically.
8.4. Managed care plans serving children in the care and
custody of the Department of Children and Families must maintain
complete medical, dental, and behavioral health encounter
information and participate in making such information available
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb163-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 163 2026
to the department or the applicable contracted community-based
care lead agency for use in providing comprehensive and
coordinated case management. The agency and the department shall
establish an interagency agreement to provide guidance for the
format, confidentiality, recipient, scope, and method of
information to be made available and the deadlines for
submission of the data. The scope of information available to
the department is shall be the data that managed care plans are
required to submit to the agency. The agency shall determine the
plan's compliance with standards for access to medical, dental,
and behavioral health services; the use of medications; and
follow up followup on all medically necessary services
recommended as a result of early and periodic screening,
diagnosis, and treatment.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb163-00